Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-3405.01
Building official, defined.

Building official means a person appointed by the state or a political subdivision having responsibility for the public safety and welfare and the enforcement of building codes with regard to buildings and other structures within such person's jurisdiction.

Laws 2011, LB45, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 6.